Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB993.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1202 of Title 8 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 1202. Specific powers.The powers of the borough shall be vested in the council. In the exercise of any specific powers involving the enactment of an ordinance or the making of any regulation, restriction or prohibition, the borough may provide for enforcement and penalties for violations. The specific powers of the borough <--<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920212223 shall include the following:* * *(66) To maintain, repair, establish or contribute to the maintenance, repair or establishment of any memorial and may receive funds from persons or organizations for those purposes. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "memorial" shall mean any monument or memorial erected or existing within the borough and commemorating or honoring first responders, including firefighters, emergency medical technicians, paramedics, emergency vehicle drivers and borough police officers.Section 2. Section 29A14(a) introductory paragraph of Title 8 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 29A14. Care and erection of memorials.(a) Authority.--The council may control and maintain a [soldier's] memorial which is:* * *(d) Definition.--For purposes of this section, the term "memorial" shall mean a monument, gun or carriage, memorial or memorial hall erected or existing within the borough and commemorating or honoring the services of any individual who has served in the Pennsylvania National Guard or any of the armed forces of the United States or their reserve components.Section 3. Title 11 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 12449. Control, maintenance and repair of memorials.(a) Authority.--Council may maintain, repair, establish or contribute to the maintenance, repair or establishment of any memorial and may receive funds from persons or organizations for those purposes.20250SB0993PN1212 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Definition.--For purposes of this section, the term "memorial" shall mean any monument or memorial erected or existing within the township and commemorating or honoring first responders, including firefighters, emergency medical technicians, paramedics, emergency vehicle drivers and city police officers.Section 4. Section 144A22(a) introductory paragraph of Title 11 is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 144A22. Care of memorials.(a) Council authority.--Council may take charge of, care for, maintain and keep in good order and repair, at the expense of the city, any [soldier's monument, gun or carriage or similar] memorial, if the memorial:* * *(c) Definitions.--For purposes of this section, the term "memorial" shall mean a monument, gun or carriage, memorial or memorial hall erected or existing within the city and commemorating or honoring the services of any individual who has served in the Pennsylvania National Guard or any of the armed forces of the United States or their reserve components.SECTION 5. SECTIONS 16155, 16156 AND 16167 OF TITLE 16, ADDED MAY 8, 2024 (P.L.50, NO.14), ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 16155. MONUMENTS, MEMORIALS AND MEMORIAL HALLS TO WAR VETERANS AND FIRST RESPONDERS.THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS MAY APPROPRIATE MONEY FOR AND PROVIDE FOR THE ERECTION OF MONUMENTS, MEMORIALS OR MEMORIAL HALLS COMMEMORATING OR HONORING THE SERVICES OF ANY INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS [SERVED IN THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES OR IN ANY AUXILIARY ORGANIZATION OFFICIALLY CONNECTED WITH A DIVISION 20250SB0993PN1212 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES.]:(1) SERVED IN THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES, OR IN ANY AUXILIARY ORGANIZATION OFFICIALLY CONNECTED WITH A DIVISION OF THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES, AND THE PENNSYLVANIA NATIONAL GUARD.(2) SERVED AS A FIRST RESPONDER. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE TERM "FIRST RESPONDER" SHALL MEAN FIREFIGHTERS, EMERGENCY MEDICAL TECHNICIANS, PARAMEDICS, EMERGENCY VEHICLE DRIVERS, POLICE OFFICERS, SHERIFFS AND DEPUTY SHERIFFS.§ 16156. ASSISTANCE TO PRIVATE OR MUNICIPAL AGENCIES.THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS MAY APPROPRIATE MONEY TO ASSIST ANY INDIVIDUAL, PRIVATE CORPORATION OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN THE ERECTION OF A MONUMENT, MEMORIAL OR MEMORIAL HALL AUTHORIZED UNDER SECTION 16155 (RELATING TO MONUMENTS, MEMORIALS AND MEMORIAL HALLS TO WAR VETERANS AND FIRST RESPONDERS).§ 16167. PRESERVATION, MAINTENANCE, REPAIR AND COMPLETION OF PUBLIC MONUMENTS.(A) CARE.--THE COUNTY COMMISSIONERS MAY PRESERVE, MAINTAIN AND REPAIR ANY PUBLIC MONUMENT OR MEMORIAL HALL IN THE COUNTY, OTHER THAN IN CEMETERIES, INCLUDING THE ENCLOSED PUBLIC GROUND SURROUNDING THE MONUMENT, AND APPROPRIATE MONEY FOR THESE PURPOSES. IF A PUBLIC MONUMENT REFERRED TO IN THIS SECTION HAS BEEN PARTIALLY COMPLETED, EITHER IN CONSTRUCTION OR PAYMENT, THE COMMISSIONERS MAY APPROPRIATE MONEY FOR THE PURPOSE OF COMPLETION.(B) DEFINITIONS.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"PUBLIC MONUMENT OR MEMORIAL HALL." THE FOLLOWING:20250SB0993PN1212 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A MONUMENT, GUN OR CARRIAGE, MEMORIAL OR MEMORIAL HALL ERECTED OR EXISTING WITHIN THE COUNTY AND COMMEMORATING OR HONORING THE SERVICES OF ANY INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS SERVED IN THE PENNSYLVANIA NATIONAL GUARD OR ANY OF THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED STATES OR THEIR RESERVE COMPONENTS; OR(2) A MONUMENT OR MEMORIAL ERECTED OR EXISTING WITHIN THE COUNTY AND COMMEMORATING OR HONORING FIRST RESPONDERS, INCLUDING FIREFIGHTERS, EMERGENCY MEDICAL TECHNICIANS, PARAMEDICS, EMERGENCY VEHICLE DRIVERS, POLICE OFFICERS AND COUNTY SHERIFFS AND DEPUTY SHERIFFS.Section 5 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0993PN1212 - 5 - <--1234567891011